District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1205

Vacancy in Office of Recorder; Deputy to fill vacancy.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1276, ch. 854, § 550
Apr. 24, 1926, 44 Stat. 322, ch. 176, § 2
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 7(b), 50 DCR 896
1981 Ed., § 45-905.
1973 Ed., § 45-704.